Utah statutes.
26-8a-103.   State Emergency Medical Services Committee -- Membership --
Report  -- Expenses.
(1)  The State Emergency Medical Services Committee created by Section 26-1-7
shall be composed of the following 16 members appointed by the governor, at
least five of whom must reside in a county of the third, fourth, fifth, or
sixth class:
(a)  five physicians licensed under Title 58, Chapter 67, Utah Medical
Practice Act, or Chapter 68, Utah Osteopathic Medical Practice Act, as
follows:
(i)  one surgeon who actively provides trauma care at a hospital;
(ii)  one rural physician involved in emergency medical care;
(iii)  two physicians who practice in the emergency department of a general
acute hospital; and
(iv)  one pediatrician who practices in the emergency department or critical
care unit of a general acute hospital or a children's specialty hospital;
(b)  one representative from a private ambulance provider;
(c)  one representative from an ambulance provider that is neither privately
owned nor operated by a fire department;
(d)  two chief officers from fire agencies operated by the following classes
of licensed or designated emergency medical services providers: municipality,
county, and fire district, provided that no class of medical services
providers may have more than one representative under this Subsection (1)(d);
(e)  one director of a law enforcement agency that provides emergency medical
services;
(f)  one hospital administrator;
(g)  one emergency care nurse;
(h)  one paramedic in active field practice;
(i)  one emergency medical technician in active field practice;
(j)  one certified emergency medical dispatcher affiliated with an emergency
medical dispatch center; and
(k)  one consumer.
(2) (a) Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), members shall be appointed to
a four-year term beginning July 1.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2)(a), the governor shall, at the time of
appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms to ensure that the
terms of committee members are staggered so that approximately half of the
committee is appointed every two years.
(c)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement
shall be appointed by the governor for the unexpired term.
(3) (a) Each January, the committee shall organize and select one of its
members as chair and one member as vice chair. The committee may organize
standing or ad hoc subcommittees, which shall operate in accordance with
guidelines established by the committee.
(b)  The chair shall convene a minimum of four meetings per year. The chair
may call special meetings.  The chair shall call a meeting upon request of
five or more members of the committee.
(c) Nine members of the committee constitute a quorum for the transaction of
business and the action of a majority of the members present is the action of
the committee.
(4)  The committee shall submit a report in a form acceptable to the committee
each November at the Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice Interim Committee
meeting concerning its:
(a)  funding priorities and recommended sources;
(b)  closest responder recommendations;
(c)  centralized dispatch;
(d)  duplication of services and any taxing consequences;
(e)  appropriate providers for emergency medical services; and
(f)  recommendations and suggested legislation.
(5) (a)  Members shall receive no compensation or benefits for their services,
but may receive per diem and expenses incurred in the performance of the
member’s official duties at the rates established by the Division of Finance
under Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.
(b)  Members may decline to receive per diem and expenses for their service.
(6)  Administrative services for the committee shall be provided by the
department.
